Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 9 Military Property

30-9-1.
Organizational property provided by state.

All organizations of the militia shall be provided by the state with arms, ammunition, equipment, uniforms, and supplies, not supplied by the United States, necessary for the proper performance of the functions and duties authorized or prescribed by the laws and regulations of the state and the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 140; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-1

.

30-9-2.
Annual allowance for maintenance of organizational property.

Each organization shall keep the property described in §

30-9-1

intact and in proper repair and in good condition; and the commanding officers of companies, batteries, or similar detachments of the national guard shall each be allowed to expend annually a sum not to exceed three dollars ($3.00) per member in keeping the property of their respective organizations in proper repair and good condition; the sums so allowed shall be based upon the average membership in these units for the year ending June 30th in each year, to be submitted by the adjutant general to each organization commander in July of each year, all of these moneys to be paid upon approval of the adjutant general after his or her receipt of proper vouchers; but the adjutant general shall not allow these sums, or any part thereof, unless the property has been kept in proper repair and in good condition, and unless duties have been properly performed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 141; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-2

.

30-9-3.
Issuance of property — Annual inventory.

Commanding officers of organizations, or other officers requiring supplies, may draw from the adjutant general, upon requisitions duly signed and approved, such arms, ammunition, uniforms, equipment, or other supplies as may be necessary, to be held and accounted for as public property. The commanding officer or other officers shall be responsible for the proper care of this property, and, on or before the first day of December in each year, shall return a complete inventory of the property to the adjutant general, stating the exact condition of the property, and satisfactory accounting for any shortage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 142; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-3

.

30-9-4.
Bonds of accountable and responsible officers.

Any officer of the militia in whose possession or responsibility shall be placed public moneys or public property owned by the state, or for which the state is liable, if required by the governor, shall give bond for the protection of the state, conditioned to faithfully and properly perform the duties of his or her office and to account for all public moneys and public property in his or her possession or for which the officer is responsible. The bonds shall be in an amount, in a form, and with surety satisfactory to the adjutant general. The premium thereon shall be paid by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 143; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-4

.

30-9-5.
Liability of officer unaffected by change in status.

Until an officer, or his or her legal representative, shall have received from the adjutant general notice that the property accounts of the officer have been examined and found correct or that shortages have been adjusted, the liability of the officer, or of his or her estate, for public moneys or for public property for which he or she is or may have been responsible, shall be in no way affected by the officer’s resignation, discharge, change in official position, or death.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 144; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-5

.

30-9-6.
Unauthorized use.

No enlisted person of the militia shall wear or use, except when on military duty, or by special permission of his or her commanding officer, any uniform or other article of military property belonging to the state or for which the state is responsible.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 145; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-6

.

30-9-7.
Clothing issued to state guard reserve.

Articles of clothing purchased by the state and issued to members of the provisional companies, Rhode Island state guard reserve, and worn by them in the service of the state, will become the property of these persons upon return of the companies to the unorganized militia after being disbanded and mustered out of active service by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1690, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-7

.

30-9-8.
Responsibility of persons to whom property issued.

Every officer and enlisted person or other person to whom public funds or public property, belonging to the state or for which the state is responsible, has been, or may hereafter be, issued shall be financially and personally responsible to the state for its good condition, safekeeping, and return when called upon by competent authority. No one shall be relieved from this responsibility, except if it is shown to the satisfaction of the governor that the loss, damage, or destruction of, or the failure to return, the property or funds was unavoidable, and not the fault of the person responsible for them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 146; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-8

.

30-9-9.
Recovery of value of lost or damaged property.

Except as indicated in §

30-9-8

, the value of the public funds or public property lost, damaged, destroyed, or unreturned, in an amount to be determined by a surveying officer, to be appointed by the governor, shall be charged against the person at fault and it shall be an indebtedness from that person to the state. If any person at fault, or his or her surety if any, shall fail to pay the full value of the lost, damaged, destroyed, or unreturned funds or property, the adjutant general may deduct the amount due from any pay or allowances due, or to become due, if any, to that person and the attorney general of the state, upon request of the adjutant general, shall bring such action or actions, in the name of the people of the state, in any court of competent jurisdiction, as may be necessary to recover from that person, or his or her surety, if any, the amount of the indebtedness or any balance remaining unpaid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 147; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-9

; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 7.

30-9-10.
Seizure of property in possession of unauthorized person.

The adjutant general, any commissioned officer authorized by the adjutant general, and any commanding officer of an organization, unit, or separate detachment of the national guard, may seize and hold any arms, ammunition, uniforms, equipment, supplies, or other military property of the state or for which the state is responsible, found in the possession of any person not entitled to the possession thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 148; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-10

.

30-9-11.
Search warrant.

Any court of the state empowered to issue search warrants, on complaint on oath made to it by the adjutant general, by any commissioned officer authorized by the adjutant general, or by any commanding officer of any organization, unit, or separate detachment of the national guard, that any arms, ammunition, uniforms, equipment, supplies, or other military property of the state, or for which the state is responsible, is unlawfully being withheld by any person within the jurisdiction of the court, and where the military property is believed to be in a particular place specified in the complaint, shall issue to any deputy sheriff, town sergeant, member of any municipal or state police, or town constable a warrant in the nature of a search warrant, commanding him or her, in the name of the state, diligently to search the house or place described therein, in the daytime and, upon the finding of the military property, the court issuing the warrant shall order the property to be delivered to the officer making the complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 149; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-11

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 58; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 31; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 31.

30-9-12.
Court order for delivery of property.

When the adjutant general, or some commissioned officer authorized by the adjutant general, shall by petition, verified by his or her oath, represent to the superior court that the person named in the petition, resident or to be found in the state, detains any arms, ammunition, uniforms, equipment, supplies, or other military property of the state or for which the state is responsible, describing the military property generally, after demand is made for the military property by the petitioner, or someone duly authorized by the petitioner, the superior court shall, upon the filing of the petition, make an order requiring the person complained against to deliver up the military property to the petitioner by such day as the court shall fix, or show cause on that day, before the court, why the military property should not be delivered up. A copy of the order, certified by the clerk of the court, shall be served on the respondent personally, or if not served personally, shall be left at his or her residence or last and usual place of abode, or place of business or employment, with a person of full age at least four (4) days before the day set for the hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 150; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-12

.

30-9-13.
Failure to comply with court order.

If the person complained against in accordance with §

30-9-12

shall not deliver up the military property as described in the petition on or before the day set for the hearing or show good cause to the contrary, on due proof of service of a copy of the order, the court may issue forthwith an attachment for contempt against the person. The person shall be held in contempt and dealt with accordingly until he or she shall comply with the order of the court and deliver up the military property to the petitioner and pay the reasonable costs of the proceedings to be taxed by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 151; G.L. 1956, §

30-9-13

.